Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB432.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 45A.380 is amended to read as follows:
A local public agency may contract or purchase through noncompetitive negotiation only
when a written determination is made that competition is not feasible and it is further
determined in writing by a designee of the local public agency that:
(1) An emergency exists which will cause public harm as a result of the delay in
competitive procedures;
(2) There is a single source within a reasonable geographical area of the product or
service to be procured;
(3) The contract is for the services of a licensed professional, such as attorney,
physician, psychiatrist, psychologist, certified public accountant, registered nurse,
or educational specialist; a technician such as a plumber, electrician, carpenter, or
mechanic; or an artist such as a sculptor, aesthetic painter, or musician, provided,
however, that this provision shall not apply to architects or engineers providing
construction management services rather than professional architect or engineer
services;
(4) The contract is for the purchase of perishable foods, such as meat, fish, poultry, egg
products, fresh vegetables, and fresh fruits;
(5) The contract is for replacement parts where the need cannot be reasonably
anticipated and stockpiling is not feasible;
(6) The contract is for proprietary items for resale;
(7) In school districts the contract relates to an enterprise in which the buying or selling
by students is a part of the educational experience;
(8) The contract or purchase is for expenditures made on authorized trips outside of the
boundaries of the local public agency;
(9) The contract is for the purchase of supplies which are sold at public auction or by
Page 1 of 4
HB043210.100 - 1176 - XXXX 2/11/2026 2:32 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 432/GA
receiving sealed bids;
(10) The contract is for group life insurance, group health and accident insurance, group
professional liability insurance, worker's compensation insurance, and
unemployment insurance;
(11) The contract is for a sale of supplies at reduced prices that will afford a purchase at
savings to the local public agency;[ or]
(12) The contract is with a private real estate developer and contains a requirement:
(a) That the developer increase the size or otherwise improve the collection
capacity of the sanitary sewer or storm water pipe serving the affected private
real estate development; and
(b) That the local public agency pay only the proportional cost of increasing the
size, or otherwise improving the collection capacity, of the sanitary sewer or
storm water pipe over the original collection capacity; or
(13) The contract is for the purchase of used vehicles or used equipment and the
purchase price does not exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of the manufacturer's
suggested retail price for the model year for a vehicle or date of manufacture for
equipment for the same or similar vehicles or equipment.
Section 2. KRS 424.260 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except where a statute specifically fixes a larger sum as the minimum for a
requirement of advertisement for bids, a[no] city, county, or district, or board or
commission of a city or county, or sheriff or county clerk, shall not[may] make a
contract, lease, or other agreement for:
(a) Materials;
(b) Supplies, except for supplies that are:
1. Perishable foods such as meat, poultry, fish, egg products, fresh
vegetables, and fresh fruits; or
2. Sold at public auction;
Page 2 of 4
HB043210.100 - 1176 - XXXX 2/11/2026 2:32 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 432/GA
(c) Equipment, except used vehicles and used equipment if the purchase price
does not exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of the manufacturer's suggested
retail price for the model year for a vehicle or date of manufacture for
equipment for the same or similar vehicles or equipment; or
(d) Contractual services other than professional;
involving an expenditure of more than forty thousand dollars ($40,000) without first
making newspaper advertisement for bids. This subsection shall not apply to the
transfer of property between governmental agencies as authorized in KRS
82.083(4)(a).
(2) If the fiscal court requires that the sheriff or county clerk advertise for bids on
expenditures of less than forty thousand dollars ($40,000), the fiscal court
requirement shall prevail.
(3) (a) Nothing in this statute shall limit or restrict the ability of a local school district
to acquire supplies and equipment outside of the bidding procedure if those
supplies and equipment meet the specifications of the contracts awarded by
the Office of Material and Procurement Services in the Office of the
Controller within the Finance and Administration Cabinet or a federal, local,
or cooperative agency and are available for purchase elsewhere at a lower
price. A board of education may purchase those supplies and equipment
without advertising for bids if, prior to making the purchases, the board of
education obtains certification from the district's finance or purchasing officer
that the items to be purchased meet the standards and specifications fixed by
state price contract, federal (GSA) price contract, or the bid of another school
district whose bid specifications allow other districts to utilize their bids, and
that the sales price is lower than that established by the various price contract
agreements or available through the bid of another school district whose bid
specifications would allow the district to utilize their bid.
Page 3 of 4
HB043210.100 - 1176 - XXXX 2/11/2026 2:32 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 432/GA
(b) The procedures set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not be
available to the district for any specific item once the bidding procedure has
been initiated by an invitation to bid and a publication of specifications for
that specific item has been published. In the event that all bids are rejected,
the district may again avail itself of the provisions of paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
(4) This requirement shall not apply in an emergency if the chief executive officer of
the city, county, or district has duly certified that an emergency exists, and has filed
a copy of the certificate with the chief financial officer of the city, county, or
district, or if the sheriff or the county clerk has certified that an emergency exists,
and has filed a copy of the certificate with the clerk of the court where his necessary
office expenses are fixed pursuant to KRS 64.345 or 64.530, or if the
superintendent of the board of education has duly certified that an emergency
exists, and has filed a copy of the certificate with the chief state school officer.
(5) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply for the purchase of
wholesale electric power for resale to the ultimate customers of a municipal utility
organized under KRS 96.550 to 96.900.
(6) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to purchases for products or services
made pursuant to KRS 82.084.
Page 4 of 4
HB043210.100 - 1176 - XXXX 2/11/2026 2:32 PM GA